fst/az.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +PAST +FUT +NEG +PLUR +LOC +GEN +CAUS

LEXICON Root
yaz    V;
oxu    V;
gör    V;
get    V;
al     V;
ver    V;
qal    V;
bax    V;
düş    V;
gəl    V;
kitab  N;
ev     N;
adam   N;
uşaq   N;
qapı   N;

gözəl  ADJ;
böyük  ADJ;
kiçik  ADJ;
yaxşı  ADJ;
pis    ADJ;

LEXICON V
+PAST:dı    #;
+FUT:acaq   #;
+NEG:ma     #;
+CAUS:dır   #;

LEXICON N
+PLUR:lar   N2;
+LOC:də     #;
+GEN:ın     #;

LEXICON N2
+LOC:də     #;
+GEN:ın     #;

LEXICON ADJ
+CAUS:dır   #;
